Missouri, session 2026, HB1632.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 135.775, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 135.775, to read as follows:
135.775. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Biodiesel blend", a blend of diesel fuel and biodiesel fuel of at least five percent
and not more than twenty percent for on-road [and] or off-road diesel-fueled vehicle use;
(2) "Biodiesel fuel", a renewable, biodegradable, mono alkyl ester combustible liquid
fuel that is derived from agricultural and other plant oils or animal fats and that meets the
most recent version of the ASTM International D6751 Standard Specification for Biodiesel
Fuel Blend Stock. A fuel shall be deemed to be biodiesel fuel if the fuel consists of a pure
B100 or B99 ratio. Biodiesel produced from palm oil is not biodiesel fuel for the purposes of
this section unless the palm oil is contained within waste oil and grease collected within the
United States;
(3) "B99", a blend of ninety-nine percent biodiesel fuel that meets the most recent
version of the ASTM International D6751 Standard Specification for Biodiesel Fuel Blend
Stock with a minimum of one-tenth of one percent and maximum of one percent diesel fuel
that meets the most recent version of the ASTM International D975 Standard Specification
for Diesel Fuel;
(4) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
(5) "Distributor", a person, firm, or corporation doing business in this state that:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1632 2
(a) Produces, refines, blends, compounds, or manufactures motor fuel;
(b) Imports motor fuel into the state; or
(c) Is engaged in distribution of motor fuel;
(6) "Retail dealer", a person, firm, or corporation doing business in this state that
owns or operates a retail service station in this state;
(7) "Retail service station", a location in this state from which biodiesel blend is sold
to the general public and is dispensed directly into motor vehicle fuel tanks for consumption
at retail.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, a retail dealer that sells a
biodiesel blend at a retail service station or a distributor that sells a biodiesel blend directly to
the final user located in this state shall be allowed a tax credit to be taken against the retail
dealer or distributor's state income tax liability. For any retail dealer or distributor with a tax
year beginning prior to January 1, 2023, but ending during the 2023 calendar year, such retail
dealer or distributor shall be allowed a tax credit for the amount of biodiesel blend sold during
the portion of such tax year that occurs during the 2023 calendar year. The amount of the
credit shall be equal to:
(1) Two cents per gallon of biodiesel blend of at least five percent but not more than
ten percent sold by the retail dealer at a retail service station or by a distributor directly to the
final user located in this state during the tax year for which the tax credit is claimed; and
(2) Five cents per gallon of biodiesel blend in excess of ten percent but not more than
twenty percent sold by the retail dealer at a retail service station or by a distributor directly to
the final user located in this state during the tax year for which the tax credit is claimed.
3. Tax credits authorized under this section shall not be transferred, sold, or assigned.
If the amount of the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's state tax liability, the difference shall be
refundable. The total amount of tax credits issued under this section for any given fiscal year
shall not exceed sixteen million dollars.
4. In the event the total amount of tax credits claimed under this section exceeds the
amount of available tax credits, the tax credits shall be apportioned among all eligible retail
dealers and distributors claiming a tax credit by April fifteenth, or as directed by section
143.851, of the fiscal year in which the tax credit is claimed.
5. The tax credit allowed by this section shall be claimed by such taxpayer at the time
such taxpayer files a return and shall be applied against the income tax liability imposed by
chapter 143, excluding the withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, after
reduction for all other credits allowed thereon. The department may require any
documentation it deems necessary to administer the provisions of this section.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057 to the contrary, the department
may work with the division of weights and measures within the department of agriculture to

HB 1632 3
validate that the biodiesel blend a retail dealer or distributor claims for the tax credit
authorized under this section contains a sufficient percentage of biodiesel fuel.
7. The department shall promulgate rules to implement and administer the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created pursuant to the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after January 2, 2023, shall be invalid
and void.
8. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December 31, 2028, unless reauthorized by an act of the general
assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of this section;
and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset. The
termination of the program as described in this subsection shall not be construed to preclude
any qualified taxpayer who claims any benefit under any program that is sunset under this
subsection from claiming such benefit for all allowable activities related to such claim that
were completed before the program was sunset or to eliminate any responsibility of the
department to verify the continued eligibility of qualified individuals receiving tax credits and
to enforce other requirements of law that applied before the program was sunset.
✔